District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.12

Commemorative Works Committee.

(a)

There is established a District of Columbia Commemorative Works Committee (“Committee”) to advise and recommend to the Mayor and the Council a disposition of each application to place a commemorative work on public space in the District of Columbia.

(b)

The Committee shall be composed of 12 voting members, 3 of whom shall be citizen members and 9 of whom shall be ex officio members. The 3 citizen members shall each be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council for a 3-year term. The following government officials, or their designated representatives, shall serve as the ex officio members:

(1)

The Director of the Office of Planning, who shall serve as chairperson of the Committee;

(2)

The Director of the Department of Parks and Recreation;

(3)

The Director of the Department of Public Works;

(4)

The Chief Property Management Officer;

(5)

The Executive Director of the Commission on the Arts and Humanities;

(6)

The Chairperson of the Historic Preservation Review Board;

(7)

The Secretary of the District of Columbia;

(8)

The Director of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs; and

(9)

The Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(c)

Each citizen member appointed to the Committee shall be a person who has displayed an active interest or ability in the visual arts, architecture, urban planning, civic design, or history.

(d)

The Mayor shall establish rules and procedures for the administration of the Committee.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 412
as added Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-275, § 2(d), 48 DCR 1660
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 25, 48 DCR 7612
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 22, 52 DCR 2638

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-42, in subsec. (b), substituted “12 voting members” for “11 voting members” and “9 of whom” for “8 of whom” in the introductory paragraph, deleted the word “and” at the end of par. (7), added “; and” at the end of par. (8); and added par. (9) relating to the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development.
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (b)(4), substituted “Chief Property Management Officer” for “Director of the Office of Property Management”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Commemorative Works on Public Space Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-564, January 31, 2001, 48 DCR 1627).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 25 of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7622).